Hawaii statutes.
§431:10B-104 Forms of credit life insurance
and credit disability insurance. Credit life insurance and credit
disability insurance shall be issued only in the following forms:

(1) Individual policies of life insurance issued to
debtors on the term plan;

(2) Individual policies of accident and health or
sickness insurance issued to debtors on a term plan or disability benefit
provisions in individual policies of credit life insurance;

(3) Group policies of life insurance issued to
creditors pursuant to section 431:10D-203 providing insurance upon the lives of
debtors on the term plan; and

(4) Group policies of accident and health or sickness
insurance issued to creditors on a term plan insuring debtors or disability
benefit provisions in group credit life insurance policies to provide such
coverage. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 212, §82]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next